Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-376
Capital stock association; transaction of business; conditions.

No capital stock association shall transact any business, except the execution of its articles of incorporation, the adoption of the bylaws, and the election of directors and officers, until such association has been approved by the department and such association has submitted to the department evidence of insurance of accounts by an agency of the federal government. This section shall not apply to existing mutual associations operating without such insurance as of August 30, 1981, if they continue to operate as mutual associations.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 21.